src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc
!! Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
!! else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
!! created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
!! to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
!! one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
!! compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

LEXICON N_TET1AT-TSORAT
+Com:%>нек-цёранек K ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т-цёрат K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне-цёратне K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнень-цёратнень K ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнеде-цёратнеде K ;

LEXICON N_TEJTERT1-TSORAT
+Com:%>нек-цёранек K ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ть-цёрат K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне-цёратне K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнень-цёратнень K ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнеде-цёратнеде K ;

LEXICON N_TET1AT-AVAT
+Com:%>нек-аванек K ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь-авась K ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть-аванть K ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень-авантень K ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ть-ават K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне-аватне K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнень-аватнень K ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тненень-аватненень K ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнеде-аватнеде K ;

+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>н-аван K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>м-авам K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:%>нь-авань K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg1:%>дон-авадон K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:%>т-ават K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:%>ть-авать K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg2:%>дот-авадот K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>зо-авазо K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:%>нзо-аванзо K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:%>нзо-аванзо K ;
+Pl+Dat+PxSg3:%>нстэнь-аванстэнь K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg3:%>донзо-авадонзо K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%>нок-аванок K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:%>нок-аванок K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxPl1:%>донок-авадонок K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%>нк-аванк K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:%>нк-аванк K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxPl2:%>донк-авадонк K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%>ст-аваст K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:%>ст-аваст K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxPl3:%>дост-авадост K ;
+SP+Abe+Indef:%>втомо-ававтомо K ;
+SP+Abl+Indef:%>до-авадо K ;
+SP+Ela+Indef:%>сто-авасто K ;
+SP+Tra+Indef:%>кс-авакс K ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:%>нень-аванень K ;

LEXICON EXCEPTIONS
тетят-цёрат+N:тетя N_TET1AT-TSORAT ;
ават-цёрат+N:ава N_TET1AT-TSORAT ;
бабат-цёрат+N:баба N_TET1AT-TSORAT ;
урьват-цёрат+N:урьва N_TET1AT-TSORAT ;
тейтерть-цёрат+N:тейтер  N_TEJTERT1-TSORAT ;
тетят-ават+N:тетя N_TET1AT-AVAT ;
